Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2154
International insurance group; criteria; determination by director.

The director may determine whether or not an insurance holding company system is an international insurance group. An insurance holding company system shall be considered an international insurance group if the insurance holding company system includes an insurer registered under section 44-2132 and:

(1) Meets the following criteria:

(a) The insurance holding company system has premiums written in at least three countries;

(b) The percentage of gross premiums written outside the United States is at least ten percent of the insurance holding company system's gross written premiums; and

(c) Based on a three-year rolling average, the total assets of the insurance holding company system are at least fifty billion dollars or the total gross written premiums of the insurance holding company system are at least ten billion dollars; or

(2) Does not meet the criteria in subdivision (1) of this section but is determined by the director to have significant international insurance business operations. Such a determination may be made anytime by the director or after a request by an insurance holding company system.

Laws 2016, LB772, § 12.